North Carolina, session 2025, HB45.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 93B-8.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93B-8.1. Use of criminal history records.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Applicant. – An individual who makes application for licensure from a board.
(2) Board. – An occupational licensing board or a State agency licensing board as
defined in G.S. 93B-1.
(3) Criminal history record. – A State or federal history of conviction of a crime,
whether a misdemeanor or felony, that bears upon an applicant's or a licensee's
fitness to be licensed or disciplined.felony.
(3a) Deny licensure or denies licensure. – To refuse to issue a license to an
applicant, to refuse to renew the license of a licensee, or to revoke the license
of a licensee.
(4) Licensee. – An individual who has obtained a license to engage in or represent
himself or herself to be a member of a particular profession or occupation.
(b) Unless federal law governing a particular board provides otherwise, a board may deny
an applicant licensure on the basis of a conviction of a crime only if the board finds that the
applicant's criminal conviction history is directly related to the duties and responsibilities for the
licensed occupation or the conviction is for a crime that is violent or sexual in nature.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board shall not automatically deny licensure on
the basis of an applicant's or licensee's criminal history, history record, and no board shall deny
an applicant a license licensure based on a determination that a conviction is for a crime of moral
turpitude. The board shall make its determination based on the factors specified in subsection
(b1) of this section.
(b1) Before a board may deny an applicant a license licensure due to a criminal conviction
under subsection (b) of this section, the board shall specifically consider all of the following
factors:
(1) The level and seriousness of the crime.
*H45-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The date of the crime.
(3) The individual's age of the individual at the time of the crime.
(4) The circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, if known.
(5) The nexus between the criminal conduct and the prospective duties of the
applicant as a licensee.
(6) The individual's prison, jail, probation, parole, rehabilitation, and employment
records of the applicant since the date the crime was committed.
(6a) The individual's completion of, or active participation in, rehabilitative drug
or alcohol treatment.
(6b) A Certificate of Relief granted pursuant to G.S. 15A-173.2.
(7) The subsequent commission of a crime by the applicant.individual's criminal
history record after the conviction.
(8) Any affidavits or other written documents, including character references.
(b2) If the board denies an applicant a license licensure under this section, the board shall
do all of the following:
(1) Make written findings specifying the factors in subsection (b1) of this section
the board deemed relevant to the applicant and explaining the reason for the
denial. The board's presiding officer shall sign the findings.
(2) Provide or serve a signed copy of the written findings to the applicant or
licensee within 60 days of the denial.
(3) Retain a signed copy of the written findings for no less than five years.
(b3) Each board shall include in its application for licensure and on its public website all
of the following information:
(1) Whether the board requires applicants to consent to a criminal history record
check.
(2) The factors considered by the board under subsection (b1) of this section when
making a determination of regarding licensure.
(3) The appeals process pursuant to Chapter 150B of the General Statutes if the
board denies an applicant licensure in whole or in part because of a criminal
conviction.
(b4) If a board requires an applicant to submit a criminal history record, the board shall
require the provider of the criminal history record to provide the applicant with access to the
applicant's criminal history record or otherwise deliver a copy of the criminal history record to
the applicant. If an applicant's criminal history includes matters that will or may prevent the board
from issuing a license to the applicant, the board shall notify the applicant in writing of the
specific issues in sufficient time for the applicant to provide additional documentation supporting
the application for consideration by the board prior to any final decision to deny the application.
After being notified of any potential issue with licensure due to one or more criminal convictions,
an applicant shall have has 30 days to respond by either correcting any inaccuracy in the criminal
history record or submitting evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation for consideration by the
board.
(b5) If, following a hearing, a board denies an application for licensure, the board's written
order shall include specific reference to any criminal conviction considered as part or all of any
basis for the denial and the rationale for the denial, as well as a reference to the appeal process
and the applicant's ability to reapply. No applicant shall be restricted from reapplying for
licensure for more than two years from the date of the most recent application.
(b6) Notwithstanding any other provisions in the law, an individual with a criminal history
may petition a board at any time, including before the individual starts or completes any
mandatory education or training requirements, for a predetermination of whether the individual's
criminal history will likely disqualify the individual from obtaining a license. This petition shall
include a criminal history record report obtained by the individual petitioner from a reporting
Page 2 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
service designated by the board, the cost of which shall be borne by the applicant. petitioner.
Criminal history records relating to a predetermination petition are not public records under
Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. A board may predetermine that the petitioner's criminal
history is likely grounds for denial of a license only after the board has applied the requirements
of subsection (b) of this section. Each board shall delegate authority for the predetermination to
its executive director or equivalent officer, or to a committee of the board, so that the
predeterminations can be made in a timely manner. No board member having served on a
predetermination committee for an individual a petitioner shall be required to recuse in any later
determinations or hearings involving the same applicant. individual as an applicant or licensee.
The board shall inform the individual petitioner of the board's determination within 45 days of
receiving the petition from the individual. The board may charge a fee to recoup its costs not to
exceed forty-five dollars ($45.00) for each petition. If the board determines an applicant a
petitioner would likely be denied licensure based on the individual's petitioner's criminal history,
the board shall notify the individual petitioner in writing of the following:
(1) The grounds and reasons for the predetermination.
(2) That the petitioner has the right to complete any requirements for licensure, to
apply to the board, and to have the petitioner's application considered by the
board under its application process.
(3) That further evidence of rehabilitation will be considered upon application.
(b7) A predetermination made under subsection (b6) of this section that a petitioner's
criminal history would likely prevent licensure is not a final agency decision and does not entitle
the individual to any right to judicial review under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes.
(b8) A predetermination made under subsection (b6) of this section that a petitioner is
eligible for a license is binding if both of the following apply:
(1) The petitioner applies for licensure and fulfills all other requirements for the
occupational license.
(2) The applicant's petitioner's submitted criminal history was correct and remains
unchanged at the time of application for a license.
(c) If a board requires an applicant to consent to a criminal history record check or use of
fingerprints or other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories of
Criminal Histories, the board may deny licensure to an applicant who refuses to consent.
(c1) Nothing in this section or in G.S. 93B-1 authorizes a board to require an applicant to
consent to a criminal history record check or use of fingerprints or other identifying information
required by the State or National Repositories of Criminal Histories as a condition of granting or
renewing a license.
(d) This section does not apply to The North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and
Training Standards Commission and the North Carolina Sheriffs' Education and Training
Standards Commission."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-79.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.2. Transporter plates.
…
(b2) Sanctions. – The following sanctions apply when a motor vehicle displaying a
"Dealer-Transporter" or "Transporter" license plate is driven in violation of the restrictions on
the use of the plate or of the requirement to have proof of financial responsibility:
(1) The individual driving the motor vehicle is responsible for an infraction and
is subject to a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00).
(2) The dealer or business to whom the plate is issued is subject to a civil penalty
imposed by the Division of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per
occurrence.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The Division may rescind all dealer license plates, dealer transporter plates,
or transporter plates issued to the dealer or business whose plate was displayed
on the motor vehicle.
(4) A person who sells, rents, leases, or otherwise provides a transporter plate to
another person in exchange for the money or any other thing of value is guilty
of a Class I felony. A conviction for a violation of this subdivision is
considered a felony involving moral turpitude for purposes of G.S. 20-294.
A penalty imposed under subdivision (1) of this subsection is payable to the county where
the infraction occurred, as required by G.S. 14-3.1. A civil penalty imposed under subdivision
(2) of this subsection shall be credited to the Highway Fund as nontax revenue. A law
enforcement officer having probable cause to believe that a transporter plate is being used in
violation of this section may seize the plate.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 20-294 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-294. Grounds for denying, suspending, placing on probation, or revoking licenses.
In accordance with G.S. 20-295 and G.S. 20-296, G.S. 20-295, 20-296, and 93B-8.1, the
Division may deny, suspend, place on probation, or revoke a license issued under this Article for
any one or more of the following grounds:
…
(9) Being convicted of an offense set forth under G.S. 14-71.2, 14-160.4, 20-79.2,
20-106.1, 20-107, or 20-112 while holding such a the license or within five
years next preceding before the date of filing the application; or being
convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude under the laws of this State,
another state, or the United States. It shall be is an affirmative defense, and
will operate as a stay of this violation, any adverse action by the Division if
the person charged is determined to qualify and obtains seeks expunction,
certificate of relief, or pardon, or, if or to have the violative conviction is
vacated. If relief is granted, this violation is any adverse action by the Board
is dismissed. If relief is denied, the stay is lifted.
…."
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 53-244.050 reads as rewritten:
"§ 53-244.050. License and registration application; claim of exemption.
(a) Applicants for a license or registration shall apply through the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry on a form acceptable to the Commissioner, including the
following information:
…
(4) The qualifications and business history of the applicant and, if applicable, the
business history of any partner, officer, or director, any person occupying a
similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or
indirectly controlling the applicant, including:applicant, including the
following:
a. A description of any injunction or administrative order by any state or
federal authority to which the person is or has been subject;subject.
b. Any conviction, within the past 10 years, of a misdemeanor involving
moral turpitude or any fraud, false statement or omission, any theft or
wrongful taking of property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting,
extortion, or conspiracy to commit any of these offenses, or involving
any financial service or financial service- related business;
andbusiness.
c. Any felony convictions.
…."
Page 4 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 53-244.060 reads as rewritten:
"§ 53-244.060. Issuance of license or registration.
If an applicant satisfies the requirements of G.S. 53-244.050, the Commissioner shall issue a
mortgage lender, mortgage broker, mortgage servicer, mortgage loan originator, or transitional
mortgage loan originator license, or a mortgage origination support registrant registration, unless
the Commissioner finds any of the following:
…
(2) The applicant or its controlling persons have been convicted of or plead guilty
or nolo contendere to a felony in a domestic, foreign, or military court:court
as described in either of the following:
a. During the seven-year period preceding the date of the application for
licensing and registration; orregistration.
b. At any time preceding the date of application, if the felony involved
an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering.
A pardon of a conviction shall not be is not a conviction for purposes of this
subdivision.
(3) The applicant or any of its controlling persons have been convicted of or plead
guilty or nolo contendere to any charge in a domestic, foreign, or military
court, within the past five years, of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude
or any fraud, false statement or omission, any theft or wrongful taking of
property, bribery, perjury, forgery, counterfeiting, extortion, or conspiracy to
commit any of these offenses, or involving any financial service or financial
service-related business. If the application is for licensure as a mortgage loan
originator, this subdivision is subject to G.S. 93B-8.1.
…."
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 58-33-46 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-33-46. Suspension, probation, revocation, or nonrenewal of licenses.
(a) The Commissioner may place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any
license issued under this Article, in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Article
3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, for any one or more of the following causes:
…
(6) Having been convicted of a any felony or of a misdemeanor involving
dishonesty, a breach of trust, or moral turpitude.dishonesty or a breach of trust.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 58-58-215 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-58-215. License revocation and denial.
The Commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license of a provider
or broker if the Commissioner finds that:any of the following:
…
(4) The Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, the licensee or any officer, partner, member, or
key management personnel has been found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or
nolo contendere to, any felony, felony or to a misdemeanor involving fraud or
moral turpitude, fraud, regardless of whether a judgment of conviction has
been entered by the court;
…."
SECTION 4.(c) G.S. 58-71-80 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-71-80. Grounds for denial, suspension, probation, revocation, or nonrenewal of
licenses.
(a) The Commissioner may deny, place on probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew
any license issued under this Article, in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and
Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, for any one or more of the following causes:
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(6) Conviction of a crime involving dishonesty, breach of trust, or moral
turpitude.dishonesty or breach of trust.
…."
SECTION 4.(d) G.S. 143-151.56 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-151.56. Suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew license.
(a) The Board may deny or refuse to issue or renew a license, may suspend or revoke a
license, or may impose probationary conditions on a license if the license holder or applicant for
licensure has engaged in any of the following conduct:
…
(5) Been Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo
contendere to any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or to any felony.a
felony or misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 66-234 reads as rewritten:
"§ 66-234. Registration of membership camping operator.
(a) The application for registration shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State
and shall include the following:
…
(12) A brief description of the membership camping operator's experience in the
membership camping business, including the length of time such the operator
has been in the membership camping business; business and a statement
detailing whether the applicant within the past five years has been convicted
of any misdemeanor or felony involving theft, fraud, dishonesty, or moral
turpitude, or dishonesty, or whether the applicant has been enjoined from, had
any civil penalty assessed for, or been found to have engaged in any violation
of any law designed to protect consumers. If the applicant is a corporation,
this statement shall be provided for each officer of the corporation.
…."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 66-237 reads as rewritten:
"§ 66-237. Registration of salespersons.
(a) It shall be is unlawful for any salesperson to offer to sell any membership camping
contract in this State unless he the salesperson is registered with the Secretary of State. The
application of a salesperson for registration shall be on a form prescribed by the Secretary of
State and shall include both of the following:
(1) A statement detailing whether the applicant within the past five years has been
convicted of any misdemeanor or felony involving theft, fraud, dishonesty, or
moral turpitude, or dishonesty, or whether the applicant has been enjoined
from, had any civil penalty assessed for, or been found to have engaged in any
violation of any law designed to protect consumers, andconsumers.
(2) A statement describing the applicant's employment history for the past five
years and whether any termination of employment during the last five years
was occasioned by any theft, fraud, or act of dishonesty.
…."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 78C-89 reads as rewritten:
"§ 78C-89. Registration as athlete agent; form; requirements.
(a) An individual seeking registration as an athlete agent shall submit an application for
registration to the Secretary of State in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State. The
application must be in the name of an individual and, except as otherwise provided in subsection
(b) of this section, signed or otherwise authenticated by the applicant under penalty of perjury
and must state or contain the following:
Page 6 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(8) Whether the applicant or any person named under subdivision (7) of this
subsection has been convicted of a crime that, if committed in this State,
would be a crime involving moral turpitude or a felony and identify the
crime.a misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or dishonesty, or a felony.
…."
SECTION 5.(d) G.S. 78C-90 reads as rewritten:
"§ 78C-90. Certificate of registration; issuance or denial; renewal.
…
(b) The Secretary of State may refuse to issue a certificate of registration if the Secretary
of State determines that the applicant has engaged in conduct that has a significant adverse effect
on the applicant's fitness to act as an athlete agent. In making the determination, the Secretary of
State may consider whether the applicant has:has done any of the following:
(1) Been convicted of a crime that, if committed in this State, would be a crime
involving moral turpitude or a felony.Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, been convicted
of a misdemeanor involving theft, fraud, or dishonesty, or a felony.
…."
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 74D-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74D-2. License requirements.
…
(d) Criminal Record Check. – An applicant must meet all of the following requirements
and qualifications determined by a background investigation conducted by the Board in
accordance with G.S. 74D-2.1 and upon receipt of an application:
(1) The applicant is at least 18 years of age.
(2) The applicant is of good moral character and temperate habits. The following
shall be prima facie evidence that the applicant does not have good moral
character or temperate habits: conviction by any local, State, federal, or
military court of any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession
of a firearm; conviction of any crime involving the illegal use, possession,
sale, manufacture, distribution or transportation of a controlled substance,
drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverages; conviction of a crime involving
felonious assault or an act of violence; conviction of a crime involving
unlawful breaking or entering, burglary, larceny, or of any offense involving
moral turpitude; or larceny; or a history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic
drug; provided that, for drug. For purposes of this subsection, subdivision,
"conviction" means and includes the entry of a plea of guilty, plea of no
contest, or a guilty verdict rendered in open court by a judge or jury.
(3) The applicant has the necessary training, qualifications qualifications, and
experience to be licensed.
…."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 74D-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74D-6. Denial of a license or registration.
Upon a finding that the applicant meets the requirements for licensure or registration under
this Chapter, the Board shall determine whether the applicant shall receive the license or
registration applied for. The grounds for denial include:Subject to the requirements of
G.S. 93B-8.1 and Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, the Board may deny
licensure on any of the following grounds:
(1) Commission of some act which, that, if committed by a registrant or licensee,
would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a registration or license
under this Chapter;Chapter.
(2) Conviction of a crime involving fraud;fraud.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Lack of good moral character or temperate habits. The following shall be is
prima facie evidence that the applicant does not have good moral character or
temperate habits: conviction by any local, State, federal, or military court of
any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or possession of a firearm;
conviction of any crime involving the illegal use, possession, sale,
manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance, drug,
narcotic, or alcoholic beverages; conviction of a crime involving felonious
assault or an act of violence; conviction of a crime involving unlawful
breaking or entering, burglary or larceny or of any offense involving moral
turpitude; burglary, or larceny; or a history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic
drug; provided that, for drug. For purposes of this subsection subdivision,
"conviction" means and includes the entry of a plea of guilty, plea of no
contest, or a guilty verdict rendered in open court by a judge or jury;jury.
(4) Previous denial under this Chapter or previous revocation for cause;cause.
(5) Knowingly making any false statement or misrepresentation in an application
made to the Board for a license or registration."
SECTION 6.(c) G.S. 74D-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 74D-10. Suspension or revocation of licenses and registrations; appeal.
(a) The Board may, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, suspend or revoke a
license or registration issued under this Chapter if it is determined that the licensee or registrant
has:has done any of the following:
…
(4) Been Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, been convicted of any crime involving moral
turpitude or any other crime involving violence or the illegal use, carrying, or
possession of a dangerous weapon.
…."
SECTION 7. G.S. 83A-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 83A-15. Denial, suspension suspension, or revocation of license.
(a) The Board shall have the power to suspend or revoke may suspend, revoke, or deny
a license or certificate of registration of an architect or a registration of an interior designer, to
deny a license or certificate of registration of an architect or a registration of an interior designer,
designer or to may reprimand or levy a civil penalty not in excess of five hundred dollars
($500.00) per violation against any registrant who is found guilty of:of any of the following:
…
(3) Unprofessional conduct, including but not limited to:
…
d. Willfully violating this Chapter or any rule or standard of conduct
published by the Board, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a
felony or any crime involving moral turpitude.Board.
…
g. Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, being convicted of or pleading guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony or misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 85B-3.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 85B-3.2. Criminal history record checks of applicants for licensure.
…
(d) If the applicant's verified criminal history record check reveals one or more
convictions of a crime that is punishable as a felony offense, or the conviction of any crime
misdemeanor involving fraud or moral turpitude, fraud, the Commission may deny the applicant's
license. However, the conviction does not automatically prohibit licensure, and the following
Page 8 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
factors listed in G.S. 93B-8.1(b1) shall be considered by the Commission in determining whether
to deny licensure:licensure.
(1) The level and seriousness of the crime.
(2) The date of the crime.
(3) The age of the person at the time of the crime.
(4) The circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, if known.
(5) The nexus between the criminal conduct of the applicant and the applicant's
duties as an auctioneer, apprentice auctioneer, or auction firm.
(6) The prison, jail, probation, parole, rehabilitation, and employment records of
the applicant since the date the crime was committed.
(7) The subsequent commission by the person of a crime.
…."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 85B-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 85B-4. Licenses required.
…
(b) No person shall be licensed as an apprentice auctioneer, auctioneer, or receive an
auction firm license if any of the following apply to the person:
…
(3) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has within the preceding five years pleaded
guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere or contendere, or been convicted
of any felony, or committed or been convicted of any act involving fraud or
moral turpitude.fraud.
…."
SECTION 8.(c) G.S. 85B-8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 85B-8. Prohibited acts; assessment of civil penalty; denial, suspension, or revocation of
license.
(a) The following shall be are grounds for the assessment of a civil penalty in accordance
with G.S. 85B-3.1(b) or the denial, suspension, or revocation of an auctioneer, auctioneer
apprentice, or auction firm license:
…
(9) The Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, the commission or conviction of a crime that is
punishable as a felony offense under the laws of North Carolina or the laws of
the jurisdiction where committed or convicted, convicted or the commission
of any act involving fraud or moral turpitude.fraud.
…."
SECTION 9. G.S. 87-47 reads as rewritten:
"§ 87-47. Penalties imposed by Board; enforcement procedures.
…
(a1) The following activities are prohibited:
…
(4) Being convicted of a crime involving fraud or moral turpitude.that is violent
or sexual in nature.
…."
SECTION 10. G.S. 89C-21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-21. Disciplinary action – Reexamination, reexamination, revocation, suspension,
reprimand, or civil penalty.
(a) The Board may reprimand the licensee, suspend, refuse to renew, refuse to reinstate,
or revoke the certificate of licensure, require additional education or, as appropriate, require
reexamination, for any engineer or land surveyor, who is found guilty of any of the following:
…
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to, any crime that is a felony, whether or not related to the
practice of engineering or surveying; conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to, any crime, whether a felony, misdemeanor, or
otherwise, where an essential element of the crime is dishonesty or when the
crime is directly related to the practice of engineering or surveying; or
conviction of, or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of any crime
involving moral turpitude.crime.
…."
SECTION 11. G.S. 90-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-14. Disciplinary Authority.authority.
(a) The Board shall have the power to may place on probation with or without conditions,
impose limitations and conditions on, conditions, publicly reprimand, assess monetary redress,
issue public letters of concern, mandate free medical services, require satisfactory completion of
treatment programs or remedial or educational training, fine, or deny, annul, suspend, or revoke
a license, license or other authority to practice medicine in this State, issued by the Board to any
person who has been found by the Board to have committed any of the following acts or conduct,
or for any of the following reasons:State on any of the following grounds:
…
(7) Conviction in any court of a crime involving moral turpitude, or the The
violation of a law involving the practice of medicine, medicine or a conviction
of a felony; provided that a felony conviction shall be treated felony as
provided in subsection (c) of this section.
…
(c) Except as provided in subsection (c1) of this section, section and subject to
G.S. 93B-8.1, a felony conviction shall result in the automatic revocation of a license issued by
the Board, Board unless the Board orders otherwise or receives a request for a hearing from the
person licensee within 60 days of the licensee receiving notice from the Board, after the
conviction, of the provisions of this subsection. If the Board receives a timely request for a
hearing in such a case, the provisions of G.S. 90-14.2 shall be followed.a hearing, the hearing
shall be conducted in accordance with G.S. 90-14.2.
…."
SECTION 12.(a) G.S. 90-30 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-30. Examination and licensing of applicants; qualifications; causes for refusal to
grant license; void licenses.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners shall grant licenses to practice
dentistry to such applicants who are graduates of a reputable dental institution, institution and
who, in the opinion of a majority of the Board, shall undergo a satisfactory examination of
proficiency in the knowledge and practice of dentistry, subject, however, to the further provisions
of this section and of the provisions dentistry and meet the other requirements of this Article.
The applicant for a license to practice dentistry shall be of good moral character, at least 18
years of age at the time the application is filed. The application for a dental license shall be made
to the Board in writing and shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the Board that the
applicant is meets the following standards:
(1) Is a person of good moral character, has an character.
(2) Meets the academic education, the standard of which shall be determined by
the Board; that the applicant is education standard of the Board.
(3) Is a graduate of and has a diploma from a reputable dental college or the dental
department of a reputable university or college recognized, accredited
accredited, and approved as such by the Board; and that the applicant has
passed Board.
Page 10 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Passes a clinical licensing examination, the standard of which shall be
determined by the Board.examination approved by the Board.
(a1) The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners is authorized to may conduct
both written or oral and clinical examinations or to and written or oral examinations or may
accept the results of other Board-approved regional or national independent third-party clinical
examinations that shall examinations. The Board shall only approve third-party clinical
examinations that include procedures performed on either human subjects or an approved
alternative, including manikins that simulate human subjects, as part of the assessment of
restorative clinical competencies and that are determined by the Board to be of such a character
as to that thoroughly test tests the qualifications of the applicant, and applicant. The Board may
refuse to grant a license to any person who, in its discretion, is found deficient in the examination.
The Board may refuse to grant a license to any person guilty of cheating, deception deception, or
fraud during the examination, or whose examination discloses to the satisfaction of the Board, a
deficiency in academic or clinical education. examination. The Board may employ such qualified
dentists found qualified therefor by the Board, in examining applicants for licenses as it deems
appropriate.
The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners may refuse to grant a license to any
person guilty of a crime involving moral turpitude, or gross immorality, or to any person addicted
to the use of alcoholic liquors or narcotic drugs to such an extent as, in the opinion of the Board,
renders the applicant unfit to practice dentistry.
Any license obtained through fraud or by any false representation shall be void ab initio and
of no effect.is void ab initio.
…."
SECTION 12.(b) G.S. 90-41 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-41. Disciplinary action.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners shall have the power and
authority to may (i) Refuse refuse to issue a license to practice dentistry; (ii) Refuse refuse to
issue a certificate of renewal of a license to practice dentistry; (iii) Revoke revoke or suspend a
license to practice dentistry; and (iv) Invoke such invoke other disciplinary measures, censure,
or probative probationary terms against a licensee as it deems fit and proper; in any instance or
instances in which if the Board is satisfied that such applicant or licensee:any of the following
applies to the applicant or licensee:
…
(3) Has been convicted of any of the criminal provisions of this Article or has
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any charge or charges arising
therefrom;
(4) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to any felony charge or to any misdemeanor charge
involving moral turpitude;a felony or misdemeanor;
(5) Has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any
charge of violation of any state or federal narcotic or barbiturate law;
…
(7) Is mentally, emotionally, or physically unfit to practice dentistry or is afflicted
with such a physical or mental disability as to be deemed dangerous to the
health and welfare of his patients. An adjudication of mental incompetency in
a court of competent jurisdiction or a determination thereof by other lawful
means shall be is conclusive proof of unfitness to practice dentistry unless or
until such person shall have been subsequently lawfully declared to be
mentally competent;a legal determination of mental competence is
subsequently declared;
…."
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 12.(c) G.S. 90-229 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-229. Disciplinary measures.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners shall have the power and
authority to may (i) Refuse refuse to issue a license to practice dental hygiene; (ii) Refuse refuse
to issue a certificate of renewal to practice dental hygiene; (iii) Revoke revoke or suspend a
license to practice dental hygiene; [and] and (iv) Invoke such invoke other disciplinary measures,
censure or probative probationary terms against a licensee as it deems proper; in any instance or
instances in which if the Board is satisfied that such applicant or licensee:any of the following
applies to the applicant or licensee:
…
(2) Has been convicted of any of the criminal provisions of this Article or has
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any charge or charges arising
therefrom;
(3) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to any felony charge or to any misdemeanor charge
involving moral turpitude;a felony or misdemeanor;
…."
SECTION 13.(a) G.S. 90-102.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-102.1. Registration of persons requiring limited use of controlled substances for
training purposes in certain businesses.
…
(c) Prerequisites for Registration. – Upon receipt of an application, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall conduct a background investigation, during the course of which
the applicant shall be required to show that the applicant meets all the following requirements
and qualifications:qualifications listed in this subsection. For purposes of this subsection,
conviction means the entry of a plea of guilty or no contest or a guilty verdict rendered in open
court by a judge or jury. The requirements are as follows:
(1) That the applicant is at least 21 years of age.
(2) That the applicant is of good moral character and temperate habits. The Any
of the following shall be is prima facie evidence that the applicant does not
have good moral character or temperate habits:
a. Conviction of any crime involving the illegal use, possession, sale,
manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled substance,
drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverage;beverage.
b. Conviction of a felony or a crime involving an act of
violence;violence.
c. Conviction of a crime involving unlawful breaking or entering,
burglary, larceny, or any offense involving moral turpitude; oror
larceny.
d. A history of addiction to alcohol or a narcotic drug;drug.
provided that, for purposes of this subsection, conviction means and includes
the entry of a plea of guilty or no contest or a verdict rendered in open court
by a judge or jury.
(3) That the applicant has not been convicted of any felony involving the illegal
use, possession, sale, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance, drug, narcotic, or alcoholic beverage.
(4) That the applicant has the necessary training, qualifications, and experience to
demonstrate competency and fitness as a dog handler as the Department of
Health and Human Services may determine by rule for all registrations to be
approved by the Department.
Page 12 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) That the applicant affirms in writing that if the application for registration is
approved, the applicant shall report all dog alerts to, or finds of, any controlled
substance to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in the area where
the dog alert occurs or where the controlled substance is found.
…
(j) Enforcement. – The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the power
to may investigate or cause to be investigated any complaints, allegations, or suspicions of
wrongdoing or violations of this section involving individuals registered or applying to be
registered under this section. The In accordance with G.S. 93B-8.1 and Article 3 of Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes, the Department or the Commission may deny, suspend, or revoke a
registration issued under this section if it is determined that the applicant or registrant has:has
done any of the following:
(1) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with
any application for a registration or for the renewal or reinstatement of a
registration.
(2) Violated any provision of this Article.
(3) Violated any rule promulgated by the Department of Health and Human
Services or the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities,
and Substance Abuse Services pursuant to the authority contained in this
Article.
…."
SECTION 13.(b) G.S. 90A-64 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90A-64. Suspensions and revocations of certificates.
(a) The Board shall have the power to may refuse to grant, grant or may suspend or
revoke, revoke any certificate issued under provisions of this Article for any of the causes
hereafter enumerated, following reasons, as determined by the Board:
…
(9) Conviction in any court of a crime involving moral turpitude or conviction of
a felony;Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or misdemeanor;
…
(a1) A registered environmental health specialist or registered environmental health
specialist intern who is convicted of a felony or a crime of moral turpitude shall report the
conviction to the Board within 30 days from the date of the conviction. A felony conviction shall
result in the automatic suspension of a certificate issued by the Board for 60 days until further
action is taken by the Board. The Board shall immediately begin the hearing process in
accordance with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Nothing in this section shall
preclude precludes the Board from taking further action.
…."
SECTION 14. G.S. 90-113.44 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-113.44. Grounds for disciplinary action.
(a) Grounds for disciplinary action for an applicant or credentialed professional
include:include any of the following:
…
(3) Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of an offense under any
municipal, State, or federal law other than traffic laws as prescribed by
Chapter 20 of the General Statutes. Conviction of a Class A through E felony
shall result in an immediate suspension of licensure, certification, or
registration for a minimum of one year.
(4) Conviction of a felony or other public offense involving moral turpitude.
Conviction of a Class A-E felony shall result in an immediate suspension of
licensure, certification, or registration for a minimum of one year.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…."
SECTION 15. G.S. 90-121.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-121.2. Rules and regulations; Rules; discipline, suspension, revocation revocation,
and regrant of certificate.
(a) The Board shall have the power to make, adopt, and promulgate such rules and
regulations, may adopt rules, including rules of ethics, as may be necessary and proper for the
regulation of the practice of the profession of optometry and for the performance of its duties.
optometry. The Board shall have has jurisdiction and power to hear and determine all complaints,
allegations, charges complaints of malpractice, corrupt or unprofessional conduct, and of the or
violation of the rules and regulations, rules, including rules of ethics, made against any
optometrist licensed to practice in North Carolina. The Board shall also have the power and
authority to: may also (i) refuse to issue a license to practice optometry; (ii) refuse to issue a
certificate of renewal of a license to practice optometry; (iii) revoke or suspend a license to
practice optometry; and (iv) invoke such other disciplinary measures, censure, or probative
probationary terms against a licensee as it deems fit and proper; in any instance or instances in
which if the Board is satisfied that such the applicant or licensee meets any of the following
criteria:
…
(3) Has been convicted of any of the criminal provisions of this Article or has
entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any charge or charges arising
therefrom;
(4) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to any felony charge or to any misdemeanor charge
involving moral turpitude;a felony or misdemeanor;
(5) Has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any
charge of violation of any State or federal narcotic or barbiturate law;
…."
SECTION 16. G.S. 90-154 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-154. Grounds for professional discipline.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Chiropractic Examiners may impose any of the
following sanctions, singly or in combination, when it finds that a practitioner or applicant is
guilty of any offense described in subsection (b):(b) of this section:
…
(b) Any one of the following is grounds for disciplinary action by the Board under
subsection (a):(a) of this section:
…
(2) Conviction of a felony or of a crime involving moral turpitude.Subject to
G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 17. G.S. 90-187.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-187.8. Discipline of licensees.
(a) Upon complaint or information, and within the Board's discretion, the Board may
revoke or suspend a license issued under this Article, may otherwise discipline a person licensed
under this Article, or may deny a license required by this Article in accordance with the
provisions of this Article, Board rules, and G.S. 93B-8.1, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.
Statutes, and Board rules. As used in this section, the word "license" includes a license, a limited
license, a veterinary faculty certificate, a zoo veterinary certificate, and a registration of a
veterinary technician and a veterinary student intern.
…
(c) Grounds for disciplinary action shall include but are not be limited to the following:
…
Page 14 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Conviction of a felony or other public offense involving moral
turpitude.felony or misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 18. G.S. 90-202.8 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-202.8. Revocation of certificate; grounds for; suspension of certificate.
(a) The North Carolina State Board of Podiatry Examiners, in accordance with
G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B (Administrative Procedure Act) of the General Statutes, shall
have the power and authority to: may (i) refuse to issue a license to practice podiatry; (ii) refuse
to issue a certificate of renewal of a license to practice podiatry; (iii) revoke or suspend a license
to practice podiatry; and (iv) invoke such other disciplinary measures, censure, or probative
probationary terms against a licensee as it deems fit and proper; in any instance or instances in
which if the Board is satisfied that such applicant or licensee:any of the following apply to the
applicant or licensee:
…
(4) Has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any
felony charge or to any misdemeanor charge involving moral turpitude;felony
or misdemeanor;
…."
SECTION 19.(a) G.S. 90-210.25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.25. Licensing.Licensing and permitting.
…
(c) Registration, Filing Filing, and Transportation. –
…
(14) The Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the permit, place
the permittee on a term of probation, or impose a civil penalty not to exceed
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with a term of probation or in
lieu instead of other disciplinary action when if it finds that any the person
permitted to transport dead human bodies has engaged in any of the following
acts:
a. Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony felony, or
a crime involving fraud or moral turpitude.fraud.
…
The Board shall have the authority to may determine the length and
conditions of any period of revocation, suspension, refusal to issue or renew,
or probation.
…
(e) Revocation; Suspension; Compromise; Disclosure. –
(1) Whenever the Board finds that an applicant for a license or a person to whom
a license has been issued by the Board is guilty of any of the following acts or
omissions and the Board also finds that the person has thereby become unfit
to practice, the Board may suspend or revoke the license or refuse to issue or
renew the license, in accordance with G.S. 93B-8.1 and the procedures set out
in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes:
a. Conviction of a felony felony, or a crime involving fraud or moral
turpitude.fraud.
…
(2) Where If the Board finds that a licensee is guilty of one or more of the acts or
omissions listed in subdivision (e)(1) (1) of this section subsection but it is
determined by the Board that the licensee has not thereby become unfit to
practice, the Board may place the licensee on a term of probation in
accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 150B of the General
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 15

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Statutes. In any case in which the Board is entitled to may place a licensee on
a term of probation, the Board may also impose a penalty of not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. The Board
may also require satisfactory completion of remedial or educational training
as a prerequisite to license reinstatement or for completing completion of the
term of probation. The Board shall have the authority to may determine the
length and conditions of any period of suspension, revocation, probation, or
refusal to issue or renew a license.
…."
SECTION 19.(b) G.S. 90-210.69 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.69. Rulemaking; enforcement of Article; judicial review; determination of
penalty amount.
…
(c) In accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B of the General
Statutes, the Board may refuse to issue or renew a license, suspend or revoke a license, or may
place the licensee on probation upon conditions set by the Board, with revocation upon failure to
comply with those conditions, if the Board finds that a licensee, an applicant for a license or an
applicant for license renewal or licensee is guilty of one or more of the following, the Board may
refuse to issue or renew a license or may suspend or revoke a license or place the holder thereof
on probation upon conditions set by the Board, with revocation upon failure to comply with the
conditions:following:
…
(3) A crime involving fraud or moral turpitude by conviction thereof.fraud.
…."
SECTION 19.(c) G.S. 90-210.123 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-210.123. Licensing and inspection.
…
(g) Whenever the Board finds that an owner, partner, crematory manager, member,
officer, or any crematory technician of a crematory licensee or any applicant to become a
crematory licensee, or that any authorized employee, agent, or representative has violated any
provision of this Article, or is guilty of any of the following acts, and when the Board also finds
that the crematory operator or applicant has thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may
suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license, in accordance with Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes:The Board may suspend or revoke a license or refuse to issue or renew a license,
in accordance with G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, if the Board finds
that an applicant or an owner, partner, crematory manager, member, officer, authorized
employee, agent, representative, or crematory technician of a crematory licensee has become
unfit to practice due to violation of this Article or any of the following:
(1) Conviction of a felony or a crime involving fraud or moral turpitude.fraud.
…
(h) Where If the Board finds a licensee is guilty of one or more of the acts or omissions
listed in subsection (g) of this section but it is determined by the Board that the licensee has not
thereby become unfit to practice, the Board may place the licensee on a term of probation in
accordance with the procedures set out in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In any case in
which the Board is entitled to place a licensee on a term of probation, the Board may also impose
a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in conjunction with the probation. The
Board may determine the length and conditions of any period of probation, suspension,
revocation, or refusal to issue or renew a license.
…."
SECTION 20. G.S. 90-249.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-249.1. Disciplinary actions.
Page 16 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The Board may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license for
any of the following:
…
(8) Being Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, being convicted of a crime involving fraud or
moral turpitude.fraud.
…."
SECTION 21. G.S. 90-270.60 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-270.60. Denial, revocation, or suspension of license; other disciplinary or remedial
actions.
(a) The Board may deny, revoke, or suspend licensure, discipline, place on probation,
limit practice, or require examination, remediation, or rehabilitation, or any combination of the
disciplinary actions described in this subsection, of any applicant or person licensed under this
Article on one or more of the following grounds:
(1) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of a felony or entered a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere to any felony charge under the laws of the United
States or of any state of the United States.
(2) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude,
misrepresentation, any of the following:
a. Misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, or conduct
public.
b. Conduct otherwise relevant to fitness to practice marriage and family
therapy, or a misdemeanor charge therapy.
c. Conduct reflecting the inability to practice marriage and family
therapy with due regard to the health and safety of clients.
…."
SECTION 22. G.S. 90-270.76 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-270.76. Suspension, revocation revocation, and refusal to renew license.
(a) The Board may deny or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license,
or may impose probationary conditions on a license if the licensee or applicant for licensure has
engaged in any of the following conduct:
…
(3) Having Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, having been convicted of or pleaded guilty
or nolo contendere to a crime involving moral turpitude or any crime which
that indicates that the occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant
is unfit or incompetent to practice occupational therapy or that the
occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant has deceived or
defrauded the public.
…."
SECTION 23. G.S. 90-270.103 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-270.103. Grounds for disciplinary action.
Grounds for disciplinary action shall include but not be are not limited to the following:
…
(3) Conviction of an offense under any municipal, State, or federal narcotic or
controlled substance law, until proof of rehabilitation can be established;
(4) Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or other public
offense involving moral turpitude, until proof of rehabilitation can be
established;or a misdemeanor;
…."
SECTION 24. G.S. 90-270.148 reads as rewritten:
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 17

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 90-270.148. Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses and health services provider
certification, revocation, and other disciplinary and remedial actions for
violations of the Code of Conduct; actions; relinquishing of license.
(a) Any applicant for licensure or health services provider certification and any person
licensed or certified under this Article shall have behaved in conformity with conform to the
ethical and professional standards specified in this Code of Conduct section and in the rules of
the Board. The Board may deny, suspend, or revoke licensure and certification, and may
discipline, place on probation, limit practice, and require examination, remediation, and
rehabilitation, or any combination thereof, all as provided for in subsection (b) below. take any
other action described in subsection (b) of this section. The Board shall act upon proof that the
applicant or licensee engaged in illegal, immoral, dishonorable, unprofessional, or unethical
conduct by violating any of the provisions of the Code of Conduct as follows:violated this section
when any of the following applies to the applicant or licensee:
(1) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of a felony or entered a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere to any felony charge;
(2) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty
or nolo contendere to any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude,
misrepresentation any of the following:
a. Misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, or conduct
public.
b. Conduct otherwise relevant to fitness to practice psychology, or a
misdemeanor charge psychology.
c. Conduct reflecting the inability to practice psychology with due regard
to the health and safety of clients or patients;
…."
SECTION 25. G.S. 90-340 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-340. Protection of the public.
(a) The Board may, in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes, deny, suspend, or revoke licensure, discipline, place on probation, limit
practice, or require examination, remediation, or rehabilitation of any person licensed under this
Article on one or more of the following grounds:
(1) Has been convicted of a felony or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
to any felony charge under the laws of the United States or of any state of the
United States.
(2) Has been convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any
misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, misrepresentation, any of the
following:
a. Misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, or conduct
public.
b. Conduct otherwise relevant to fitness to practice clinical mental health
counseling, or a misdemeanor charge counseling.
c. Conduct reflecting the inability to practice clinical mental health
counseling with due regard to the health and safety of clients or
patients.
…."
SECTION 26. G.S. 90-363 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-363. Suspension, revocation revocation, and refusal to renew license.
(a) The Board may deny or refuse to renew a license, may suspend or revoke a license,
or may impose probationary conditions on a license if the licensee or applicant for licensure has
engaged in any of the following conduct:
…
Page 18 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Conviction of or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime involving
moral turpitude.Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a crime.
…."
SECTION 27. G.S. 90-390 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-390. Refusal, suspension, or revocation of a certificate.
(a) A certificate applied for or issued under this Article may be refused, suspended,
revoked, or otherwise limited as provided in subsection (e) of this section by the Board upon
proof that any of the following applies to the applicant or person to whom a certificate was issued:
(1) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of a felony;
(2) Has Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving
moral turpitude, misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, public
or an offense relevant to fitness to practice certified fee-based pastoral
counseling;
…."
SECTION 28. G.S. 90-633 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-633. Disciplinary action.
(a) The Board may deny, suspend, revoke, or refuse to license a massage and bodywork
therapist or applicant for any of the following:
…
(3) Conviction of an offense under any municipal, State, or federal narcotic or
controlled substance law.
(4) Conviction of a felony or other public offense involving moral
turpitude.Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 29. G.S. 90-659 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-659. Suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew a license.
(a) The Board shall take the necessary actions to deny or refuse to renew a license,
suspend or revoke a license, or to impose probationary conditions on a licensee or applicant if
any of the following applies to the licensee or applicant:
…
(2) Was Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, was convicted of or entered a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere to any crime involving moral turpitude.a crime.
…."
SECTION 30. G.S. 90-742 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-742. Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses and other disciplinary and remedial
actions for violations of the Code of Conduct; actions; relinquishing of license.
(a) Any applicant for licensure and any individual licensed under this Article shall
comply with the ethical and professional standards specified in this Code of Conduct section and
in the rules of the Board. The Board may deny, suspend, or revoke licensure and may discipline,
place on probation, limit practice, and require examination, remediation, and rehabilitation of
any applicant or licensee, as provided for in subsection (b) of this section, for any violation listed
in this subsection. The following are considered violations of the Code of Conduct:this section:
(1) Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or entry of a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere to any felony charge.
(2) Conviction Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, conviction of a felony or entry of a plea
of guilty or nolo contendere to any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude,
misrepresentation any of the following:
a. Misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, or conduct
public.
b. Conduct otherwise relevant to fitness to practice, or a misdemeanor
charge practice.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 19

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Conduct reflecting the inability to practice behavior analysis relating
with due regard to the health and safety of clients or patients.
…."
SECTION 31. G.S. 90B-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90B-11. Disciplinary procedures.
(a) The Board may, in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B
of the General Statutes, deny, suspend, or revoke an application, certificate, or license on any of
the following grounds:
(1) Conviction of or the entering of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any
misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, misrepresentation any of the
following:
a. Misrepresentation or fraud in dealing with the public, conduct public.
b. Conduct otherwise relevant to fitness to practice social work, or any
misdemeanor work.
c. Conduct reflecting the inability to practice social work with due regard
to the health and safety of clients or patients.
(2) Conviction of a felony or the entering of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to
a felony under the laws of the United States or of any state of the United States.
…."
SECTION 32.(a) G.S. 93A-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93A-6. Disciplinary action by Commission.
…
(b) The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under the provisions of
this Chapter or reprimand or censure any licensee when:when any of the following has occurred:
(1) The licensee has obtained a license by false or fraudulent
representation;representation.
(2) The Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, the licensee has been convicted or has entered a
plea of guilty or no contest upon which final judgment is entered by a court of
competent jurisdiction in this State, or any other state, of any misdemeanor or
felony that involves false swearing, misrepresentation, deceit, extortion, theft,
bribery, embezzlement, false pretenses, fraud, forgery, larceny,
misappropriation of funds or property, perjury, or any other offense showing
professional unfitness or involving moral turpitude which that would
reasonably affect the licensee's performance in the real estate
business;business.
(3) The licensee has violated any of the provisions of G.S. 93A-6(a) subsection
(a) of this section when selling, leasing, or buying the licensee's own
property;property.
(4) The broker's unlicensed employee, who is exempt from the provisions of this
Chapter under G.S. 93A-2(c)(6), has committed, in the regular course of
business, any act which, that, if committed by the broker, would constitute a
violation of G.S. 93A-6(a) subsection (a) of this section for which the broker
could be disciplined; ordisciplined.
(5) The licensee, who is also licensed as an appraiser, attorney, home inspector,
mortgage broker, general contractor, or member of another licensed
profession or occupation, has been disciplined for an offense under any law
involving fraud, theft, misrepresentation, breach of trust or fiduciary
responsibility, or willful or negligent malpractice.
…."
SECTION 32.(b) G.S. 93A-38 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93A-38. Suspension, revocation revocation, or denial of certification.
Page 20 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The Commission shall have the power to may suspend, revoke, deny issuance, or deny
renewal of certification of a private real estate education provider. In all proceedings to suspend,
revoke revoke, or deny a certification, the provisions of G.S. 93B-8.1 and Chapter 150B of the
General Statutes shall be applicable. apply. The Commission may suspend, revoke, or deny such
certification or renewal thereof when if it finds that the applicant or principal thereof applicant,
principal, or holder of such the certification has done any of the following:
…
(6) Pleaded guilty, entered a plea of nolo contendere contendere, or been found
guilty of a crime involving moral turpitude in any state or federal court."
SECTION 32.(c) G.S. 93A-54 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93A-54. Disciplinary action by Commission.
…
(b) Following a hearing, the Commission shall also have power to may, subject to
G.S. 93B-8.1, suspend or revoke any certificate of registration issued under the provisions of this
Article or to reprimand or censure any regulated party when the regulated party has been
convicted or has entered a plea of guilty or no contest upon which final judgment is entered by a
court of competent jurisdiction in this State, or any other state, of the criminal offenses of
embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretense, fraud, forgery, conspiracy to defraud, or
any other offense involving moral turpitude which that would reasonably affect the regulated
party's performance in the timeshare business.
…."
SECTION 33. G.S. 93B-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93B-1. Definitions.
As used in this Chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) License. – Any license (other than a privilege license), certificate, or other
evidence of qualification which that an individual is required to obtain before
he the individual may engage in or represent himself or herself to be a member
of a particular profession or occupation.
(2) Occupational licensing board. – Any board, committee, commission, or other
agency in North Carolina which that is established for the primary purpose of
regulating the entry of persons into, and the conduct of persons within, a
particular profession or occupation, occupation and which that is authorized
to issue licenses. The phrase "occupational licensing board" does not include
State agencies, agencies staffed by full-time State employees, which
employees who, as a part of their regular functions may functions, issue
licenses.
(3) State agency licensing board. – Any State agency staffed by full-time State
employees, which employees who, as part of their regular functions functions,
issue licenses. This section does not apply to the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Education and Training Standards Commission, the North Carolina
Sheriffs' Education and Training Standards Commission, and the North
Carolina Department of Revenue. The following is a nonexclusive list of State
agency licensing boards and the profession or occupation for which the board,
agency, or officer may issue licenses:
a. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
1. Commissioner of Agriculture.
I. Scale Technician. Article 6 of Chapter 81A of the
General Statutes.
II. Seed Dealer. Article 31 of Chapter 106 of the General
Statutes.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 21

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
III. Livestock Dealer. Article 35B of Chapter 106 of the
General Statutes.
2. North Carolina Pesticide Board.
I. Pesticide Applicators and Pesticide Dealers. Parts 3 and
4 of Article 52 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
3. North Carolina Board of Agriculture.
I. Boarding Kennel Operator and Pet Shop Owner.
Article 3 of Chapter 19A of the General Statutes.
II. Poultry, Hatcheries, and Chick Dealers. Article 40 49
of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.
4. Structural Pest Control Committee.
I. Exterminator and Structural Pest Control Applicator.
Article 4C of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes.
b. Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9G.7(c), effective July 1,
2021.
c. The Department of Health and Human Services.
1. North Carolina Medical Care Commission.
I. Ambulance Attendant, Emergency Medical
Technician. Article 7 of Chapter 131E of the General
Statutes.
2. Well Contractors Certification Commission.
I. Well Contractor. Article 7A of Chapter 87 of the
General Statutes.
d. The Department of Insurance.
1. Commissioner of Insurance.
I. Bail Bond Runner, Professional Bondsman, Surety
Bondsman. Article 71 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
II. Insurance Agent, Insurance Company Adjuster, Motor
Vehicle Damage Appraiser, Self-Employed Insurance
Adjuster. Article 33 of Chapter 58 of the General
Statutes.
2. Code Officials Qualifications Board.
I. Building Inspector, Code Enforcement Official,
Electrical Inspector, Fire Inspector, Mechanical
Inspector, Plumbing Inspector. Article 9C of Chapter
58 143 of the General Statutes.
3. Home Inspection Licensure Board.
I. Home Inspector. Article 9F of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes.
4. Manufactured Housing Board.
I. Manufactured Housing Salesperson. Article 9A of
Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
e. Repealed by Session Laws 2021-138, s. 17(a), effective December 1,
2021.
f. The Department of Labor.
1. Boiler Safety Bureau.
I. Boiler Inspector. Article 7A of Chapter 95 of the
General Statutes.
g. The Department of Public Instruction.
1. State Board of Education.
Page 22 House Bill 45-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
I. Teacher, Principal, Superintendent. Article 71E 17E of
Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
h. The Department of Public Safety.
1. Alcohol Law Enforcement Branch.
I. Boxer, Kickboxer, Mixed Martial Arts, Promoter.
Article 8 68 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.
2. The Alcohol Beverage Control Board.
I. Alcoholic Beverage Distributor. Article 9 of Chapter
18B.
3. Private Protective Services Board.
I. Counter Intelligence Licensee, Armored Car Service,
Close Personal Protection, Courier Service, Digital
Forensics Examiner, Electronic Countermeasures,
Guard Dog Service Operator, Service, Polygraph
Examiner, Private Investigator, Psychological Stress
Evaluator, Security Guard, and Patrol Licensee. Guard
and Patrol, and Special Limited Guard and Patrol.
Article 1 of Chapter 74C of the General Statutes.
4. Alarm Systems Licensing Board.
I. Alarm Systems Business. Article 1 of Chapter 74D of
the General Statutes.
i. The Department of the Secretary of State.
1. The Secretary of State.
I. Athletic Athlete Agent. Article 9 of Chapter 78C of the
General Statutes.
II. Investment Advisor. Adviser. Article 3 of Chapter 78C
of the General Statutes.
III. Securities Broker, Securities Dealer, Security
Salesman. Article 5 of Chapter 78A of the General
Statutes.
IV. Professional Solicitor. Article 3 of Chapter 131F of the
General Statutes.
j. The Department of Transportation.
1. Division of Motor Vehicles.
I. New and Used Motor Vehicle Dealer, Motor Vehicle
Sales Representative, Distributor, Distributor Branch,
Distributor Representative, Wholesaler. Article 12 of
Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.
II. Commercial Driver, Truck Driver. Article 2 of Chapter
20 of the General Statutes.
III. Safety Inspection Mechanic. Article 3A of Chapter 20
of the General Statutes."
SECTION 34. G.S. 93D-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93D-13. Discipline, suspension, revocation of licenses and registrations; records.
(a) The Board may in its discretion administer the punishment of private reprimand,
suspension of license or registration for a fixed period or revocation of license or registration as
the case may warrant in their judgment for any violation of the rules and regulations of the Board
or for any of the following causes:
…
(4) Commission Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, commission of a criminal offense
indicating professional unfitness.
House Bill 45-First Edition Page 23

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(7) Conduct involving fraud or any other business conduct involving moral
turpitude.Business conduct involving fraud.
…."
SECTION 35. G.S. 93E-1-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 93E-1-12. Disciplinary action by Board.
…
(b) Following a hearing, or by consent, the Appraisal Board may also suspend or revoke
any registration, license, or certificate issued under the provisions of this Chapter or reprimand
any registered trainee, licensee, or certificate holder when:
(1) The Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, the registered trainee, licensee, or certificate
holder has been convicted of or has entered a plea of guilty or no contest upon
which final judgment is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in this
State, or any other state, to an offense which involves moral turpitude, in
which an essential element is dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, or which, in the
discretion of the Board, that would reasonably affect the performance of the
registered trainee, licensee, or certificate holder in the real estate appraisal
business;
…."
SECTION 36.(a) G.S. 106-65.26 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-65.26. Qualifications for certified applicator and licensee; applicants for certified
applicator's identification card and license.
…
(d) All applicants for license must have practical experience and knowledge of practical
and scientific facts underlying the practice of structural pest control, control of wood-destroying
organisms, or fumigation. No Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, no applicant is entitled to take an
examination for the issuance of a license pursuant to this Article who has within five years of
the date of application been convicted, entered a plea of guilty or of nolo contendre, contendere,
or forfeited bond in any State or federal court for a violation of G.S. 106-65.25(b), any felony, or
any crime involving moral turpitude.G.S. 106-65.25(b), a felony, or a misdemeanor.
…."
SECTION 36.(b) G.S. 106-610 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-610. Grounds for refusal, suspension suspension, or revocation of license.
The Commissioner may refuse to grant or renew any license, may suspend or may revoke
any license upon a showing by substantial and competent evidence of any of the following:
…
(6) The dealer or applicant has been convicted, pled guilty or nolo contendere
within three years in any state or federal court of a crime involving moral
turpitude.Subject to G.S. 93B-8.1, the dealer or applicant has, within three
years, been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to a crime in any
state or federal court.
…."
SECTION 37. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 24 House Bill 45-First Edition